Utah statutes.
53-11-114.   Licensure -- Qualification credit for specified training.
(1)  An applicant under this chapter may be exempt from meeting all or a
portion of the experience or training requirements for licensure if the
applicant:
(a)  holds a criminal justice bachelor's degree from an accredited college or
university;
(b)  is certified to have successfully completed the state Peace Officers
Standards and Training basic training course provided under Section 53-6-202;
or
(c)  provides adequate proof of having successfully completed a training
course which the board finds is essentially similar to the training course
under Subsection (1)(b).
(2)  The board determines to what extent training listed under this section
may meet the experience or training requirements for licensure under this
chapter.
